Hawaii statutes.
§461-6 Examination; license. (a)
Every applicant for a license as a pharmacist shall meet all qualifications set
by the board including, but not limited to, passing all examinations as
prescribed by rules of the board. The board shall determine the passing score
for each examination.

(b) Every applicant for a license as a
pharmacist, except an applicant applying under section 461-8.5, shall apply on
a form to be supplied by the board and shall either file the form with the
board at least sixty days before the examination, or if taking the examination
in another state pursuant to the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy
Score Transfer Program, shall file the form no later than ninety days after the
examination. Each application shall be accompanied by application and
examination fees. The board shall establish the schedule for examinations.

(c) Each applicant who successfully passes
each required examination and meets all other requirements of the board shall
pay a license fee.

(d) An applicant who fails an examination
shall file an application for reexamination in the examination for which a
passing score was not achieved and shall not be licensed until the applicant
successfully passes all of the licensure examinations. [L 1949, c 175, pt of
§1; RL 1955, §71-6; am L 1957, c 316, §11; HRS §461-6; am L 1979, c 10, §1; am
L 1984, c 7, §62; am L 1986, c 143, §7; am L 1988, c 74, §1; am L 1992, c 196,
§5; am L 1995, c 34, §3; am L 1998, c 42, §1]

Cross References

Disposal of examination records, see §94-5.

Professional testing services, see §26-9.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next